Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0621.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 2. As used in this act: (a) "Absent voter" is means a voter who utilizes the process described in section 759. (b) "Absent voter ballot" means a ballot that is issued to a voter through the absent voter process. (c) "Ballot container" is defined in section 14a. (d) "Ballot question committee" means that term as defined in section 2 of the Michigan campaign finance act, 1976 PA 388, MCL 169.202. (e) "Business day" or "secular day" means a day that is not a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday. (f) "Change the result of the election" means either of the following: (i) Elect a different candidate. (ii) Result in the opposite outcome for a ballot question. (g) "Clearly observable boundaries" is defined in section 654a. (h) "Common carrier" means a company that transports mail, on reasonable request, on regular routes and at set rates. (i) "Educational institution" means a public or private institution, or a separate school or department of a public or private institution, that is authorized by law or an accrediting body to grant or issue a diploma, degree, certificate, or license, or to grant approval to practice a profession or engage in an enterprise, and includes, but is not limited to, an academy, high school, college, university, community college, junior college, secondary school, extension course, or a business, nursing, professional, secretarial, technical, or vocational school. (j) "Election" means an election or primary election at which the electors of this state or of a subdivision of this state choose or nominate by ballot an individual for public office or decide a ballot question lawfully submitted to them. (k) "Election precinct" is defined in section 654. (l) "Fall" state and county conventions and "spring" state and county conventions are assigned meanings in section 596. (m) "General election" or "general November election" means the election held on the November regular election date in an even numbered year. (n) "Identification for election purposes" means, if issued to the individual presenting the card or document and if presented for voting purposes the name on the card or document sufficiently matches the individual's name in the individual's voter registration record so as to accurately identify the individual as the registered elector, or if issued to the individual presenting the card or document and if presented for voter registration purposes, any of the following: (i) An Except as otherwise provided in this subparagraph, an operator's or chauffeur's license issued under the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.1 to 257.923, or an enhanced driver license issued under the enhanced driver license and enhanced official state personal identification card act, 2008 PA 23, MCL 28.301 to 28.308. This subparagraph does not include either of the following: (A) A mobile operator's or chauffeur's license issued under section 310a of the motor vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.310a. (B) A mobile enhanced driver license issued under section 4 of the enhanced driver license and enhanced official state personal identification card act, 2008 PA 23, MCL 28.304. (ii) An Except as otherwise provided in this subparagraph, an official state personal identification card issued under 1972 PA 222, MCL 28.291 to 28.300, or an enhanced official state personal identification card issued under the enhanced driver license and enhanced official state personal identification card act, 2008 PA 23, MCL 28.301 to 28.308. This subparagraph does not include either of the following: (A) A mobile official state personal identification card issued under section 2 of 1972 PA 222, MCL 28.292. (B) A mobile enhanced official state personal identification card issued under section 4 of the enhanced driver license and enhanced official state personal identification card act, 2008 PA 23, MCL 28.304. (iii) A Except as otherwise provided in this subparagraph, a current operator's or chauffeur's license issued by another state. This subparagraph does not include a mobile operator's or chauffeur's license issued by another state. (iv) A Except as otherwise provided in this subparagraph, a current state personal identification card issued by another state. This subparagraph does not include a mobile state personal identification card issued by another state. (v) A current state government issued photo identification card. (vi) A current United States passport or federal government issued photo identification card. (vii) A current military photo identification card. (viii) A current tribal photo identification card. (ix) A current photo identification card issued by a local government. (x) A current student photo identification card issued by an educational institution. (o) "Immediate family" means an individual's father, mother, son, daughter, brother, sister, and spouse and a relative of any degree residing in the same household as that individual. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S04150'25) or House Bill No. ____ (request no. H04150'25). (b) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S04151'25) or House Bill No. ____ (request no. H04151'25). (c) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S04152'25) or House Bill No. ____ (request no. H04152'25).